Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116J.408] COOPERATIVE GRANTS. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may establish and implement a grant program to help finance new cooperatives that organize for purposes of operating a processing facility or marketing a product or service. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible grantee under this section must: new text end new text begin (1) be a cooperative organized under chapter 308A, 308B, or 308C; new text end new text begin (2) certify that all control of the cooperative is from persons who are patrons or who are actively engaged in the activities pursued by the cooperative; new text end new text begin (3) be operated primarily to process, market, or provide services produced in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (4) operate primarily in service of Minnesota-based patrons; and new text end new text begin (5) not allow nonpatron voting rights. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may receive applications and make grants up to $50,000 to eligible grantees for feasibility, marketing analysis, assistance with organizational development, financing and managing new cooperatives, product development, development of business and marketing plans, and predesign of facilities, including site analysis, the development of bid specifications, preliminary blueprints and schematics, and the completion of purchase agreements and other necessary legal documents. new text end new text begin (d) Grants must be matched dollar-for-dollar with other money or in-kind contributions. new text end